Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.200

Injunctive relief—Agency may seek.

The agency may seek injunctive relief, after giving notice to the affected party, in a court of competent jurisdiction for a violation of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter. The agency need not allege or prove that the agency has no adequate remedy at law. The right of injunction provided in this section is in addition to any other legal remedy which the agency has and is in addition to any right of criminal prosecution provided by law. The existence of agency action with respect to alleged violations of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter does not operate as a bar to an action for injunctive relief under this section.

[ 1986 c 299 s 20.]